Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.020

Identity theft.

(1) No person may knowingly obtain, possess, use, or transfer a means of identification or financial information of another person, living or dead, with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any crime.

(2) Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice violates subsection (1) of this section and obtains credit, money, goods, services, or anything else of value in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars in value, or when the accused knowingly targets a senior or vulnerable individual in carrying out a violation of subsection (1) of this section, shall constitute identity theft in the first degree. Identity theft in the first degree is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A person is guilty of identity theft in the second degree when he or she violates subsection (1) of this section under circumstances not amounting to identity theft in the first degree. Identity theft in the second degree is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4) Each crime prosecuted under this section shall be punished separately under chapter 9.94A RCW, unless it is the same criminal conduct as any other crime, under RCW 9.94A.589.

(5) Whenever any series of transactions involving a single person's means of identification or financial information which constitute identity theft would, when considered separately, constitute identity theft in the second degree because of value, and the series of transactions are a part of a common scheme or plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all of the transactions shall be the value considered in determining the degree of identity theft involved.

(6) Every person who, in the commission of identity theft, shall commit any other crime may be punished therefor as well as for the identity theft, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

(7) A person who violates this section is liable for civil damages of one thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater, including costs to repair the victim's credit record, and reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.

(8) In a proceeding under this section, the crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where the person whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

(9) The provisions of this section do not apply to any person who obtains another person's driver's license or other form of identification for the sole purpose of misrepresenting his or her age.

(10) In a proceeding under this section in which a person's means of identification or financial information was used without that person's authorization, and when there has been a conviction, the sentencing court may issue such orders as are necessary to correct a public record that contains false information resulting from a violation of this section.

[ 2017 c 4 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016); 2008 c 207 s 4; 2004 c 273 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 22; 2001 c 217 s 9; 1999 c 368 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—Intent—Construction—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See notes following RCW 9.35.005.

Finding—Intent—2008 c 207 ss 3 and 4: See note following RCW 9.35.001.

Finding—Purpose—2004 c 273: "The legislature finds that identity theft and the other types of fraud is a significant problem in the state of Washington, costing our citizens and businesses millions each year. The most common method of accomplishing identity theft and other fraudulent activity is by securing a fraudulently issued driver's license. It is the purpose of this act to significantly reduce identity theft and other fraud by preventing the fraudulent issuance of driver's licenses and identicards." [ 2004 c 273 s 1.]

Effective date—2004 c 273: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 273 s 5.]

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.